Utah statutes.
16-16-201.   Signing of records delivered for filing to division.
(1)  A record delivered to the division for filing pursuant to this chapter
shall be signed as follows:
(a)  The initial articles of organization shall be signed by at least one
organizer.
(b)  A statement of cancellation under Subsection 16-16-302(4) shall be signed
by at least one organizer.
(c)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (1)(d), a record signed on
behalf of an existing limited cooperative association shall be signed by an
officer.
(d)  A record filed on behalf of a dissolved association shall be signed by a
person winding up activities under Section 16-16-1206 or a person appointed
under Section 16-16-1206 to wind up those activities.
(e)  Any other record shall be signed by the person on whose behalf the record
is delivered to the division.
(2)  Any record to be signed under this chapter may be signed by an authorized
agent.
